dictionaries/da_DK/da_DK.dic
afstøbe/20,21,22,79,39
AMS/37,86
andorransk/28,39
annotation/10,11,2,39,29
ansvarsløs/10,38,49,24,39
ansvarspådragende/27,39
anvendelsesorienteret/10,26,39
assyrer/5,2,10,39,31
astrologisk/28,39
bage/1,21,22,79,39
barstol/5,2,10,39,30,29
beboelig/10,39,24,23,49
beklæde/20,21,22,79,39
beslutsomhed/44,10,39,29
besvogret/10,26,39
bevidst/24,10,49,39
biblicisme/44,10,39,31
bistandspolitisk/28,39
bjergsom/40,49,10,39,59
Bk/37,86
blodsygdom/10,19,39,29
bomstærk/10,38,49,24,39
bordelaisesauce/10,11,2,39,31
bortvende/20,21,22,79,39
bosiddende/27,39
broderlig/10,39,24,23,49
brugernavn/4,10,5,39,30
byggestil/5,2,10,39,29
bølgekam/10,19,39,29
cand.pæd./10,11,2,39,37 ph:cand. pæd.
committe/1,21,22,79,39
Cr/37,86
crush/10,46,4,39,31 al:crushes al:crushes'
dagplejebørn/74,10,39,30,29
dansksindet/10,26,39
dekadisk/28,39
distancearbejde/45,10,39,56
DOS/37
drapering/10,11,2,39,29
dværgeflok/10,19,39
dødbange/24,10,49,39
dødning/10,11,2,39,30
Ediacara/9,37
efterlevelsesværdig/10,39,24,23,49
eftervise/20,21,22,79,39
eksistentialisme/44,10,39,31
eksportfremmende/27,39
energitung/10,38,49,24,39
ensom/40,49,10,39,59
etableret/10,26,39
excitomotorisk/28,39 ph:eksitomotorisk ph:exitomotorisk
faksimilere/1,21,22,79,39
festlig/10,39,24,23,49
fladbuk/10,19,39
flebotrombose/44,10,39,31
fliget/10,26,39
folkeskoleområde/10,4,11,39,31
foresiddende/27,39
forglemme/20,21,22,79,39
forgrovelse/10,11,2,39,29
forkastelig/10,39,24,23,49
fortale/20,21,22,79,39
forvirre/1,21,22,79,39
fraktioneret/10,26,39
fritvoksende/27,39
fuld/10,38,49,24,39
fødselsdagsbørn/74,10,39,30,29
gamma-hydroxy-butyrat/10,39,37
gasformig/10,39,24,23,49
gavesæk/10,19,39
gedeblad/10,2,46,39,31
gennemkoge/20,21,22,79,39
glemsom/40,49,10,39,59
grovlemmet/10,26,39
gøgler/5,2,10,39,31
habilitering/44,10,39,29
habsburgsk/28,39
hallucinere/1,21,22,79,39
halvbevidst/24,10,49,39
hårtop/10,19,39
hensigtsløs/10,38,49,24,39
hensyntagende/27,39
hieroglyfskrift/44,10,39,31
hofguldsmed/5,2,10,39,30
hvilsom/40,49,10,39,59
højesteretsdom/10,19,39,29
højtsiddende/27,39
IB/37
iltfattig/10,39,24,23,49
inddele/20,21,22,79,39
inklusiv/24,10,49,39
instrumentere/1,21,22,79,39
interskandinavisk/28,39
iskrystal/10,3,39,31
isomeriseret/10,26,39
jobmæssig/10,39,24,23,49
jordvindende/27,39
jovial/10,38,49,24,39
juleafslutning/10,11,2,39,29
klaphat/10,19,39,67
klips/10,2,46,39,30
kubisk/28,39
kvalfuld/10,38,49,24,39
kvarte/1,21,22,79,39
kvindekrop/10,19,39,29
kær/10,38,49,24,39
landbohistorisk/28,39
langsom/40,49,10,39,59,88
lavindkomst/10,11,2,39,31
lavspænding/10,11,2,39,29
lgbtq/37
ligeartet/10,26,39
livsfarlig/10,39,24,23,49
lovforberedende/27,39
lungesæk/10,19,39,29
løft/10,46,4,39,30
løse/20,21,22,79,39
metakognitiv/24,10,49,39
middelhøj/10,38,49,24,39
militærpolitisk/28,39
mistænksom/40,49,10,39,59
moppe/1,21,22,79,39
mountainbike/10,39,37 al:mountainbikes al:mountainbiken al:mountainbikens al:mountainbikes al:mountainbikes' al:mountainbikene al:mountainbikenes
møblering/10,11,2,39,29
natronlud/44,10,39,31
nedbøre/1,21,22,79,39
nordlig/10,39,24,23,49
næstkommende/27,39
nøgenhat/10,19,39,67
nøjsom/40,49,10,39,59
omtrentlig/10,39,24,23,49
opadrettet/10,26,39
oplede/20,21,22,79,39
optativisk/28,39
OSS/50,37,86
overlejre/1,21,22,79,39
påhitsom/40,49,10,39,59
papegøjefisk/10,2,46,39,30
paranormal/10,38,49,24,39
passibel/24,10,49,39
personlighedsudvikling/10,11,2,39,29
proviantmester/14,10,13,39,31
prøvesmage/20,21,22,79,39
psykiatrisk/28,39
psykosocial/10,38,49,24,39
råmarinere/1,21,22,79,39
regnfattig/10,39,24,23,49
rektangulær/10,38,49,24,39
retningsgivende/27,39
Rg/37,86
romanhelt/5,2,10,39,30
rus/7,10,39
rødskjoldet/10,26,39
rødtop/10,19,39
savblad/4,10,5,39,29
skånsom/40,49,10,39,59
skattefri/10,38,49,24,39
skeje/1,21,22,79,39
skoleengelsk/28,39
skriftklog/10,38,49,24,39
slidsom/40,49,10,39,59
slotssogn/4,10,5,39,30,29
slud/10,39,31
sluttende/27,39
snurrig/10,39,24,23,49
spidsvinklet/10,26,39
spilkoge/20,21,22,79,39
spindler/5,2,10,39,31
stoffri/10,38,49,24,39
stok/10,19,39,61
strålebeskyttelseslov/5,2,10,39,29
stænke/1,21,22,79,39
suspekt/24,10,49,39
SUV/50,37
svigerbørn/74,10,39,30,29
thinitisk/28,39
tiendeplads/10,11,2,39,31
tilbageskuende/27,39
toholdsskift/10,46,4,39
tossegod/10,38,49,24,39
trafikdræbe/20,21,22,79,39
trampet/10,26,39
trivselsmæssig/10,39,24,23,49
tvivlsom/40,49,10,39,59
typebestemme/20,21,22,79,39
tyv/5,2,10,39,30
tændblok/10,19,39,31
tæppemand/44,10,39,29
uansøgt/24,10,49,39
uforudsigelig/10,39,24,23,49
uhjemlet/10,26,39
umeddelsom/40,49,10,39,59
undersøge/20,21,22,79,39
upåklagelig/10,39,24,23,49
usammenhængende/27,39
usporlig/10,39,24,23,49
uvirksom/40,49,10,39,59
velkarakteriseret/10,26,39
venstresidig/24,10,49,39
vestgående/27,39,37
veterinær/10,38,49,24,39
videbegærlig/10,39,24,23,49
vædde/1,21,22,79,39,31
værgemål/10,46,4,39,29
walisisk/28,39,31
økonoma/10,11,2,39,31
østerssovs/10,11,2,39,30
